Wisconsin, session 2025, AB430.
do enact as follows:AB430,11Section 1. 111.335 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB430,2,62111.335 (2) (b) Notwithstanding s. 111.322, it is not employment 3discrimination because of arrest record to refuse to employ or license, or to suspend 4from employment or licensing, any individual who is subject to a pending criminal 5charge if the circumstances of the charge substantially relate to the circumstances 6of the particular job or licensed activity, except as provided in sub. (4) (a).AB430,27Section 2. 111.335 (4) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB430,2,138111.335 (4) (a) (intro.) It is employment discrimination because of arrest 9record for a licensing agency to refuse to license any individual under sub. (2) (b) or 10to suspend an individual from licensing under sub. (2) (b) solely because the 11individual is subject to a pending criminal charge, unless the circumstances of the 12charge substantially relate to the circumstances of the particular licensed activity 13and the charge is for any of the following:AB430,2,1414